Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-611
Primary health care provider; duties.

Before acting upon a health care decision made by a surrogate, other than those decisions made at or about the time of the initial determination of incapacity, the primary health care provider shall confirm that the individual continues to be incapable. The confirmation shall be stated in writing and shall be included in the individual's medical records. The notice requirements set forth in section 30-607 shall not apply to the confirmation required by this section.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 11.